Nebraska, session 109, LB364.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 37-342, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
37-342 The commission may enter into long-term leases, lease-purchase
agreements, or other agreements with private or governmental agencies for the
control and use of real estate for state park system purposes. Except as
authorized in section 37-907, the commission shall not provide a local
governmental subdivision or agency thereof with an indication of intent to
incorporate into the state park system any land or facilities owned or
developed by such subdivision or agency unless the indication of intent is
first approved by the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not in session, the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council. When seeking such approval, the
commission shall provide the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not in
session, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council with the estimated
fiscal impact of the incorporation, including the extent to which the costs of
the incorporation can reasonably be expected to be paid from cash funds and the
extent to which the costs will likely be required to be paid from General Fund
appropriations.
Sec. 2. Original section 37-342, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-1-